Florida, session 2026, SB1298.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 28 29 Section 1.âParagraph (d) of subsection (4) of section 30 119.071, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 31 119.071âGeneral exemptions from inspection or copying of 32 public records.â 33 (4)âAGENCY PERSONNEL INFORMATION.â 34 (d)1.âFor purposes of this paragraph, the term: 35 a.ââHome addressesâ means the dwelling location at which an 36 individual resides and includes the physical address, mailing 37 address, street address, parcel identification number, plot 38 identification number, legal property description, neighborhood 39 name and lot number, GPS coordinates, and any other descriptive 40 property information that may reveal the home address. 41 b.ââJudicial assistantâ means a court employee assigned to 42 the following class codes: 8140, 8150, 8310, and 8320. 43 c.ââTelephone numbersâ includes home telephone numbers, 44 personal cellular telephone numbers, personal pager telephone 45 numbers, and telephone numbers associated with personal 46 communications devices. 47 2.a.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 48 and photographs of active or former sworn law enforcement 49 personnel or of active or former civilian personnel employed by 50 a law enforcement agency, including correctional and 51 correctional probation officers, personnel of the Department of 52 Children and Families whose duties include the investigation of 53 abuse, neglect, exploitation, fraud, theft, or other criminal 54 activities, personnel of the Department of Health whose duties 55 are to support the investigation of child abuse or neglect, and 56 personnel of the Department of Revenue or local governments 57 whose responsibilities include revenue collection and 58 enforcement or child support enforcement; the names, home 59 addresses, telephone numbers, photographs, dates of birth, and 60 places of employment of the spouses and children of such 61 personnel; and the names and locations of schools and day care 62 facilities attended by the children of such personnel are exempt 63 from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 64 Constitution. 65 b.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 66 and photographs of current or former nonsworn investigative 67 personnel of the Department of Financial Services whose duties 68 include the investigation of fraud, theft, workersâ compensation 69 coverage requirements and compliance, other related criminal 70 activities, or state regulatory requirement violations; the 71 names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, and 72 places of employment of the spouses and children of such 73 personnel; and the names and locations of schools and day care 74 facilities attended by the children of such personnel are exempt 75 from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 76 Constitution. 77 c.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 78 and photographs of current or former nonsworn investigative 79 personnel of the Office of Financial Regulationâs Bureau of 80 Financial Investigations whose duties include the investigation 81 of fraud, theft, other related criminal activities, or state 82 regulatory requirement violations; the names, home addresses, 83 telephone numbers, dates of birth, and places of employment of 84 the spouses and children of such personnel; and the names and 85 locations of schools and day care facilities attended by the 86 children of such personnel are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 87 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 88 d.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 89 and photographs of current or former firefighters certified in 90 compliance with s. 633.408; the names, home addresses, telephone 91 numbers, photographs, dates of birth, and places of employment 92 of the spouses and children of such firefighters; and the names 93 and locations of schools and day care facilities attended by the 94 children of such firefighters are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and 95 s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 96 e.âThe home addresses, dates of birth, and telephone 97 numbers of current or former justices of the Supreme Court, 98 district court of appeal judges, circuit court judges, and 99 county court judges and current judicial assistants; the names, 100 home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, and places of 101 employment of the spouses and children of current or former 102 justices and judges and current judicial assistants; and the 103 names and locations of schools and day care facilities attended 104 by the children of current or former justices and judges and of 105 current judicial assistants are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 106 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. This sub-subparagraph 107 is subject to the Open Government Sunset Review Act in 108 accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand repealed on October 2, 109 2028, unless reviewed and saved from repeal through reenactment 110 by the Legislature. 111 f.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 112 and photographs of current or former state attorneys, assistant 113 state attorneys, statewide prosecutors, or assistant statewide 114 prosecutors; the names, home addresses, telephone numbers, 115 photographs, dates of birth, and places of employment of the 116 spouses and children of current or former state attorneys, 117 assistant state attorneys, statewide prosecutors, or assistant 118 statewide prosecutors; and the names and locations of schools 119 and day care facilities attended by the children of current or 120 former state attorneys, assistant state attorneys, statewide 121 prosecutors, or assistant statewide prosecutors are exempt from 122 s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 123 g.âThe home addresses, dates of birth, and telephone 124 numbers of general magistrates, special magistrates, judges of 125 compensation claims, administrative law judges of the Division 126 of Administrative Hearings, and child support enforcement 127 hearing officers, and the chair, commissioners, and hearing 128 officers of the Public Employees Relations Commission; the 129 names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, and 130 places of employment of the spouses and children of general 131 magistrates, special magistrates, judges of compensation claims, 132 administrative law judges of the Division of Administrative 133 Hearings, and child support enforcement hearing officers, and 134 the chair, commissioners, and hearing officers of the Public 135 Employees Relations Commission; and the names and locations of 136 schools and day care facilities attended by the children of 137 general magistrates, special magistrates, judges of compensation 138 claims, administrative law judges of the Division of 139 Administrative Hearings, and child support enforcement hearing 140 officers, and the chair, commissioners, and hearing officers of 141 the Public Employees Relations Commission are exempt from s. 142 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 143 h.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 144 and photographs of current or former human resource, labor 145 relations, or employee relations directors, assistant directors, 146 managers, or assistant managers of any local government agency 147 or water management district whose duties include hiring and 148 firing employees, labor contract negotiation, administration, or 149 other personnel-related duties; the names, home addresses, 150 telephone numbers, dates of birth, and places of employment of 151 the spouses and children of such personnel; and the names and 152 locations of schools and day care facilities attended by the 153 children of such personnel are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 154 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 155 i.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 156 and photographs of current or former code enforcement officers; 157 the names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 158 and places of employment of the spouses and children of such 159 personnel; and the names and locations of schools and day care 160 facilities attended by the children of such personnel are exempt 161 from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 162 Constitution. 163 j.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, places of 164 employment, dates of birth, and photographs of current or former 165 guardians ad litem, as defined in s. 39.01; the names, home 166 addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, and places of 167 employment of the spouses and children of such persons; and the 168 names and locations of schools and day care facilities attended 169 by the children of such persons are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and 170 s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 171 k.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 172 and photographs of current or former juvenile probation 173 officers, juvenile probation supervisors, detention 174 superintendents, assistant detention superintendents, juvenile 175 justice detention officers I and II, juvenile justice detention 176 officer supervisors, juvenile justice residential officers, 177 juvenile justice residential officer supervisors I and II, 178 juvenile justice counselors, juvenile justice counselor 179 supervisors, human services counselor administrators, senior 180 human services counselor administrators, rehabilitation 181 therapists, and social services counselors of the Department of 182 Juvenile Justice; the names, home addresses, telephone numbers, 183 dates of birth, and places of employment of spouses and children 184 of such personnel; and the names and locations of schools and 185 day care facilities attended by the children of such personnel 186 are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 187 Constitution. 188 l.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 189 and photographs of current or former public defenders, assistant 190 public defenders, criminal conflict and civil regional counsel, 191 and assistant criminal conflict and civil regional counsel; the 192 names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, and 193 places of employment of the spouses and children of current or 194 former public defenders, assistant public defenders, criminal 195 conflict and civil regional counsel, and assistant criminal 196 conflict and civil regional counsel; and the names and locations 197 of schools and day care facilities attended by the children of 198 current or former public defenders, assistant public defenders, 199 criminal conflict and civil regional counsel, and assistant 200 criminal conflict and civil regional counsel are exempt from s. 201 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 202 m.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 203 and photographs of current or former investigators or inspectors 204 of the Department of Business and Professional Regulation; the 205 names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, and 206 places of employment of the spouses and children of such current 207 or former investigators and inspectors; and the names and 208 locations of schools and day care facilities attended by the 209 children of such current or former investigators and inspectors 210 are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 211 Constitution. 212 n.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, and dates of 213 birth of county tax collectors; the names, home addresses, 214 telephone numbers, dates of birth, and places of employment of 215 the spouses and children of such tax collectors; and the names 216 and locations of schools and day care facilities attended by the 217 children of such tax collectors are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and 218 s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 219 o.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 220 and photographs of current or former personnel of the Department 221 of Health whose duties include, or result in, the determination 222 or adjudication of eligibility for social security disability 223 benefits, the investigation or prosecution of complaints filed 224 against health care practitioners, or the inspection of health 225 care practitioners or health care facilities licensed by the 226 Department of Health; the names, home addresses, telephone 227 numbers, dates of birth, and places of employment of the spouses 228 and children of such personnel; and the names and locations of 229 schools and day care facilities attended by the children of such 230 personnel are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of 231 the State Constitution. 232 p.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 233 and photographs of current or former impaired practitioner 234 consultants who are retained by an agency or current or former 235 employees of an impaired practitioner consultant whose duties 236 result in a determination of a personâs skill and safety to 237 practice a licensed profession; the names, home addresses, 238 telephone numbers, dates of birth, and places of employment of 239 the spouses and children of such consultants or their employees; 240 and the names and locations of schools and day care facilities 241 attended by the children of such consultants or employees are 242 exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 243 Constitution. 244 q.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 245 and photographs of current or former emergency medical 246 technicians or paramedics certified under chapter 401; the 247 names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, and 248 places of employment of the spouses and children of such 249 emergency medical technicians or paramedics; and the names and 250 locations of schools and day care facilities attended by the 251 children of such emergency medical technicians or paramedics are 252 exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 253 Constitution. 254 r.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 255 and photographs of current or former personnel employed in an 256 agencyâs office of inspector general or internal audit 257 department whose duties include auditing or investigating waste, 258 fraud, abuse, theft, exploitation, or other activities that 259 could lead to criminal prosecution or administrative discipline; 260 the names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 261 and places of employment of spouses and children of such 262 personnel; and the names and locations of schools and day care 263 facilities attended by the children of such personnel are exempt 264 from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 265 Constitution. 266 s.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 267 and photographs of current or former directors, managers, 268 supervisors, nurses, and clinical employees of an addiction 269 treatment facility; the home addresses, telephone numbers, 270 photographs, dates of birth, and places of employment of the 271 spouses and children of such personnel; and the names and 272 locations of schools and day care facilities attended by the 273 children of such personnel are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 274 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. For purposes of this 275 sub-subparagraph, the term âaddiction treatment facilityâ means 276 a county government, or agency thereof, that is licensed 277 pursuant to s. 397.401 and provides substance abuse prevention, 278 intervention, or clinical treatment, including any licensed 279 service component described in s. 397.311(27). 280 t.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 281 and photographs of current or former directors, managers, 282 supervisors, and clinical employees of a child advocacy center 283 that meets the standards of s. 39.3035(2) and fulfills the 284 screening requirement of s. 39.3035(3), and the members of a 285 Child Protection Team as described in s. 39.303 whose duties 286 include supporting the investigation of child abuse or sexual 287 abuse, child abandonment, child neglect, and child exploitation 288 or to provide services as part of a multidisciplinary case 289 review team; the names, home addresses, telephone numbers, 290 photographs, dates of birth, and places of employment of the 291 spouses and children of such personnel and members; and the 292 names and locations of schools and day care facilities attended 293 by the children of such personnel and members are exempt from s. 294 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 295 u.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, places of 296 employment, dates of birth, and photographs of current or former 297 staff and domestic violence advocates, as defined in s. 298 90.5036(1)(b), of domestic violence centers certified by the 299 Department of Children and Families under chapter 39; the names, 300 home addresses, telephone numbers, places of employment, dates 301 of birth, and photographs of the spouses and children of such 302 personnel; and the names and locations of schools and day care 303 facilities attended by the children of such personnel are exempt 304 from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 305 Constitution. 306 v.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 307 and photographs of current or former inspectors or investigators 308 of the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services; the 309 names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, and 310 places of employment of the spouses and children of current or 311 former inspectors or investigators; and the names and locations 312 of schools and day care facilities attended by the children of 313 current or former inspectors or investigators are exempt from s. 314 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. This 315 sub-subparagraph is subject to the Open Government Sunset Review 316 Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand repealed on 317 October 2, 2028, unless reviewed and saved from repeal through 318 reenactment by the Legislature. 319 w.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 320 and photographs of current county attorneys, assistant county 321 attorneys, deputy county attorneys, city attorneys, assistant 322 city attorneys, and deputy city attorneys; the names, home 323 addresses, telephone numbers, photographs, dates of birth, and 324 places of employment of the spouses and children of current 325 county attorneys, assistant county attorneys, deputy county 326 attorneys, city attorneys, assistant city attorneys, and deputy 327 city attorneys; and the names and locations of schools and day 328 care facilities attended by the children of current county 329 attorneys, assistant county attorneys, deputy county attorneys, 330 city attorneys, assistant city attorneys, and deputy city 331 attorneys are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of 332 the State Constitution. This exemption does not apply to a 333 county attorney, assistant county attorney, deputy county 334 attorney, city attorney, assistant city attorney, or deputy city 335 attorney who qualifies as a candidate for election to public 336 office. This sub-subparagraph is subject to the Open Government 337 Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand 338 repealed on October 2, 2029, unless reviewed and saved from 339 repeal through reenactment by the Legislature. 340 x.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 341 and photographs of current or former commissioners of the 342 Florida Gaming Control Commission; the names, home addresses, 343 telephone numbers, dates of birth, photographs, and places of 344 employment of the spouses and children of such current or former 345 commissioners; and the names and locations of schools and day 346 care facilities attended by the children of such current or 347 former commissioners are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), 348 Art. I of the State Constitution. This sub-subparagraph is 349 subject to the Open Government Sunset Review Act in accordance 350 with s. 119.15 and shall stand repealed on October 2, 2029, 351 unless reviewed and saved from repeal through reenactment by the 352 Legislature. 353 y.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 354 and photographs of current clerks of the circuit court, deputy 355 clerks of the circuit court, and clerk of the circuit court 356 personnel; the names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates 357 of birth, and places of employment of the spouses and children 358 of current clerks of the circuit court, deputy clerks of the 359 circuit court, and clerk of the circuit court personnel; and the 360 names and locations of schools and day care facilities attended 361 by the children of current clerks of the circuit court, deputy 362 clerks of the circuit court, and clerk of the circuit court 363 personnel are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of 364 the State Constitution. This sub-subparagraph is subject to the 365 Open Government Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 366 and shall stand repealed on October 2, 2029, unless reviewed and 367 saved from repeal through reenactment by the Legislature. 368 z.(I)âAs used in this sub-subparagraph, the term: 369 (A)ââCongressional memberâ means a person who is elected to 370 serve as a member of the United States House of Representatives 371 or is elected or appointed to serve as a member of the United 372 States Senate. 373 (B)ââPartial home addressâ means the dwelling location at 374 which an individual resides and includes the physical address, 375 mailing address, street address, parcel identification number, 376 plot identification number, legal property description, 377 neighborhood name and lot number, GPS coordinates, and any other 378 descriptive property information that may reveal the partial 379 home address, except for the city and zip code. 380 (C)ââPublic officerâ means a person who holds one of the 381 following offices: Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Chief 382 Financial Officer, Attorney General, Agriculture Commissioner, 383 state representative, state senator, property appraiser, 384 supervisor of elections, school superintendent, school board 385 member, mayor, city commissioner, or county commissioner. 386 (II)âThe following information is exempt from s. 119.07(1) 387 and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution: 388 (A)âThe partial home addresses of a current congressional 389 member or public officer and his or her spouse or adult child. 390 (B)âThe telephone numbers of a current congressional member 391 or public officer and his or her spouse or adult child. 392 (C)âThe name, home addresses, telephone numbers, and date 393 of birth of a minor child of a current congressional member or 394 public officer and the name and location of the school or day 395 care facility attended by the minor child. 396 (III)âThis sub-subparagraph is subject to the Open 397 Government Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and 398 shall stand repealed on October 2, 2030, unless reviewed and 399 saved from repeal through reenactment by the Legislature. 400 3.a.âAn agency that is the custodian of the information 401 specified in subparagraph 2. and that is not the employer of the 402 officer, employee, justice, judge, or other person specified in 403 subparagraph 2. must maintain the exempt status of that 404 information only if the officer, employee, justice, judge, other 405 person, or employing agency of the designated employee submits a 406 written and notarized request for maintenance of the exemption 407 to the custodial agency. The request must state under oath the 408 statutory basis for the individualâs exemption request and 409 confirm the individualâs status as a party eligible for exempt 410 status. 411 b.âAn agency that is the custodian of information specified 412 in sub-subparagraph 2.z. and that is not the employer of the 413 congressional member, public officer, or other person specified 414 in sub-subparagraph 2.z. must maintain the exempt status of that 415 information only if an individual requests the maintenance of an 416 exemption pursuant to sub-subparagraph 2.z. on the basis of 417 eligibility as a current congressional member or public officer 418 and his or her spouse or child submits, as part of the written 419 and notarized request required by sub-subparagraph a., the date 420 of the congressional memberâs or public officerâs election or 421 appointment to public office, the date on which that office is 422 next subject to election, and, if applicable, the date on which 423 the current congressional memberâs or public officerâs minor 424 child reaches the age of majority. The custodian must maintain 425 an exemption granted pursuant to sub-subparagraph 2.z. until the 426 qualifying conditions for the exemption no longer apply to the 427 person subject to the exemption. 428 4.a.âA county property appraiser, as defined in s. 429 192.001(3), or a county tax collector, as defined in s. 430 192.001(4), who receives a written and notarized request for 431 maintenance of the exemption pursuant to subparagraph 3. must 432 comply by removing the name of the individual with exempt status 433 and the instrument number or Official Records book and page 434 number identifying the property with the exempt status from all 435 publicly available records maintained by the property appraiser 436 or tax collector. For written requests received on or before 437 July 1, 2021, a county property appraiser or county tax 438 collector must comply with this sub-subparagraph by October 1, 439 2021. A county property appraiser or county tax collector may 440 not remove the street address, legal description, or other 441 information identifying real property within the agencyâs 442 records so long as a name or personal information otherwise 443 exempt from inspection and copying pursuant to this section is 444 not associated with the property or otherwise displayed in the 445 public records of the agency. 446 b.âAny information restricted from public display, 447 inspection, or copying under sub-subparagraph a. must be 448 provided to the individual whose information was removed. 449 5.âAn officer, an employee, a justice, a judge, or other 450 person specified in subparagraph 2. may submit a written request 451 for the release of his or her exempt information to the 452 custodial agency. The written request must be notarized and must 453 specify the information to be released and the party authorized 454 to receive the information. Upon receipt of the written request, 455 the custodial agency must release the specified information to 456 the party authorized to receive such information. 457 6.âThe exemptions in this paragraph apply to information 458 held by an agency before, on, or after the effective date of the 459 exemption. 460 7.âInformation made exempt under this paragraph may be 461 disclosed pursuant to s. 28.2221 to a title insurer authorized 462 pursuant to s. 624.401 and its affiliates as defined in s. 463 624.10; a title insurance agent or title insurance agency as 464 defined in s. 626.841(1) or (2), respectively; or an attorney 465 duly admitted to practice law in this state and in good standing 466 with The Florida Bar. 467 8.âThe exempt status of a home address contained in the 468 Official Records is maintained only during the period when a 469 protected party resides at the dwelling location. Upon 470 conveyance of real property after October 1, 2021, and when such 471 real property no longer constitutes a protected partyâs home 472 address as defined in sub-subparagraph 1.a., the protected party 473 must submit a written request to release the removed information 474 to the county recorder. The written request to release the 475 removed information must be notarized, must confirm that a 476 protected partyâs request for release is pursuant to a 477 conveyance of his or her dwelling location, and must specify the 478 Official Records book and page, instrument number, or clerkâs 479 file number for each document containing the information to be 480 released. 481 9.âUpon the death of a protected party as verified by a 482 certified copy of a death certificate or court order, any party 483 can request the county recorder to release a protected 484 decedentâs removed information unless there is a related request 485 on file with the county recorder for continued removal of the 486 decedentâs information or unless such removal is otherwise 487 prohibited by statute or by court order. The written request to 488 release the removed information upon the death of a protected 489 party must attach the certified copy of a death certificate or 490 court order and must be notarized, must confirm the request for 491 release is due to the death of a protected party, and must 492 specify the Official Records book and page number, instrument 493 number, or clerkâs file number for each document containing the 494 information to be released. A fee may not be charged for the 495 release of any document pursuant to such request. 496 Section 2.âThe amendment made by this act to s. 497 119.071(4)(d)2.g., Florida Statutes, is subject to the Open 498 Government Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15, 499 Florida Statutes, and shall stand repealed on October 2, 2031, 500 unless reviewed and saved from repeal through reenactment by the 501 Legislature. If the expansion of the exemption is not saved from 502 repeal, the text of that sub-subparagraph shall revert to that 503 in existence on June 30, 2026, except that any amendments to 504 such text enacted other than by this act shall be preserved and 505 continue to operate to the extent that such amendments are not 506 dependent upon the amendment to the text which expires pursuant 507 to this section. 508 Section 3.âSubsection (10) of section 447.205, Florida 509 Statutes, is amended to read: 510 447.205âPublic Employees Relations Commission.â 511 (10)âThe deliberations of the commission in any proceeding 512 before it are closed and exempt from the provisions of s. 513 286.011. However, any hearing held or oral argument heard by the 514 commission pursuant to this chapter or chapter 120 is or this 515 chapter shall be open to the public. All draft orders and 516 related written communications that are developed in preparation 517 for, or preliminary to, the issuance of any order by the 518 commission or its designees a final written order are 519 confidential and exempt from the provisions of s. 119.07(1) and 520 s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 521 Section 4.âThe amendment made by this act to s. 522 447.205(10), Florida Statutes, is subject to the Open Government 523 Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15, Florida 524 Statutes, and shall stand repealed on October 2, 2031, unless 525 reviewed and saved from repeal through reenactment by the 526 Legislature. If the expansion of the exemption is not saved from 527 repeal, the text of that subsection shall revert to that in 528 existence on June 30, 2026, except that any amendments to such 529 text enacted other than by this act shall be preserved and 530 continue to operate to the extent that such amendments are not 531 dependent upon the amendment to the text which expires pursuant 532 to this section. 533 Section 5.âSubsection (1) of section 447.308, Florida 534 Statutes, is amended to read: 535 447.308âRevocation of certification of employee 536 organization.â 537 (1)âAny employee or group of employees which no longer 538 desires to be represented by the certified bargaining agent may 539 file with the commission a petition to revoke certification. The 540 petition must shall be accompanied by dated statements signed by 541 at least 30 percent of the employees in the unit, indicating 542 that such employees no longer desire to be represented for 543 purposes of collective bargaining by the certified bargaining 544 agent. The time of filing said petition is shall be governed by 545 the provisions of s. 447.307(3)(d) relating to petitions for 546 certification. The showing of interest signed by the employees 547 is confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), 548 Article I of the State Constitution, except that any employee, 549 employer, or employee organization having sufficient reason to 550 believe any of the employee signatures were obtained by 551 collusion, coercion, intimidation, or misrepresentation or are 552 otherwise invalid shall be given a reasonable opportunity to 553 verify and challenge the signatures appearing on the petition. 554 The commission or one of its designated agents shall investigate 555 the petition to determine its sufficiency. If the commission 556 finds the petition to be insufficient, it may dismiss the 557 petition. If the commission finds that the petition is 558 sufficient, it shall immediately: 559 (a)âIdentify the bargaining unit and determine which public 560 employees shall be qualified and entitled to vote in the 561 election held by the commission. 562 (b)âIdentify the public employer or employers. 563 (c)âOrder an election by secret ballot, the cost of said 564 election to be borne equally by the parties, except as the 565 commission may provide by rule. The commissionâs order assessing 566 costs of an election may be enforced pursuant to the provisions 567 of this part. 568 Section 6.âThe amendment made by this act to s. 447.308(1), 569 Florida Statutes, is subject to the Open Government Sunset 570 Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15, Florida Statutes, and 571 shall stand repealed on October 2, 2031, unless reviewed and 572 saved from repeal through reenactment by the Legislature. If the 573 expansion of the exemption is not saved from repeal, the text of 574 that subsection shall revert to that in existence on June 30, 575 2026, except that any amendments to such text enacted other than 576 by this act shall be preserved and continue to operate to the 577 extent that such amendments are not dependent upon the amendment 578 to the text which expires pursuant to this section. 579 Section 7.â(1)âThe Legislature finds that it is a public 580 necessity that the home addresses, dates of birth, and telephone 581 numbers of the chair, commissioners, and hearing officers of the 582 Public Employees Relations Commission; the names, home 583 addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, and places of 584 employment of the spouses and children of such personnel; and 585 the names and locations of schools and day care facilities 586 attended by the children of such personnel be made exempt from 587 s. 119.07(1), Florida Statutes, and s. 24(a), Article I of the 588 State Constitution. Such personnel and their families are at a 589 heightened risk of physical and emotional harm from disgruntled 590 individuals who have contentious reactions to actions taken by 591 the commission. In addition, such personnel may be subject to 592 threats or acts of revenge because of the duties they perform. 593 The spouses and children of such personnel are also endangered 594 by individuals who seek to intimidate or harm such personnel. 595 The Legislature finds that the harm that may result from the 596 release of such personal identifying and location information 597 outweighs any public benefit that may be derived from the 598 disclosure of the information. 599 (2)âThe Legislature finds that it is a public necessity 600 that draft orders and related written communications that are 601 developed in preparation for, or preliminary to, the issuance of 602 any order by the Public Employees Relations Commission or its 603 designees be made confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1), 604 Florida Statutes, and s. 24(a), Article I of the State 605 Constitution. The Public Employees Relations Commission, as a 606 quasi-judicial agency, speaks through its written orders based 607 on the law and facts. The commission and its hearing officers 608 rely on the confidentiality of draft orders and written 609 communications related to these drafts before they become final 610 and are released to the public. The existing provision in s. 611 447.205(10), Florida Statutes, addresses this confidentiality 612 and recognizes its importance to the proper functioning of the 613 commission. However, it was adopted in 1977, with the only 614 substantive amendment being made in 1991. To avoid the existing 615 provision from being inadvertently read so as to allow public 616 access to draft orders or commission deliberations, including 617 preliminary work prepared by commission hearing officers, the 618 Legislature finds that it is a public necessity that the 619 language of the provision providing for confidentiality and 620 exemption of commission deliberations and draft orders be 621 clarified to reflect updates in technology, current practices of 622 the commission related to the use of hearing officers, and 623 modern methods of communication. The confidentiality and 624 exemption of commission deliberations and draft orders are 625 essential to the operation of the commission. Likewise, the 626 confidentiality and exemption of written communications related 627 to draft orders are essential to the operation of the commission 628 given updates in technology, commission practice of using 629 hearing officers as designees to prepare draft orders and assist 630 in preparing final orders, and modern methods of communication. 631 The Legislature further finds that the harm that may result from 632 the release of written communications related to draft orders, 633 in light of current technology, practices, and methods of 634 communication, outweighs any public benefit that may be derived 635 from the disclosure of such written communications. 636 (3)âThe Legislature further finds that it is a public 637 necessity that the showing of interest statements signed by 638 public employees indicating their desire to no longer be 639 represented by their bargaining agent be made confidential and 640 exempt from s. 119.07(1), Florida Statutes, and s. 24(a), 641 Article I of the State Constitution. The showing of interest 642 statements signed by public employees indicating their desire to 643 be represented by a bargaining agent is already confidential and 644 exempt pursuant to s. 447.307, Florida Statutes, in order to 645 avoid the practical effect of chilling the employeesâ exercise 646 of the right to form and join a union. Similarly, the showing of 647 interest statements seeking to decertify a union must be kept 648 confidential in order to avoid the practical effect of chilling 649 the employeesâ exercise of the right to no longer be represented 650 by a union. The Legislature finds that the harm that may result 651 from the release of this showing of interest information 652 outweighs any public benefit that may be derived from the 653 disclosure of the information. 654 Section 8.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.